Florida, session 2026, SB1148.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (j) of subsection (2) and subsection 15 (3) of section 215.5586, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 16 215.5586âMy Safe Florida Home Program.âThere is established 17 within the Department of Financial Services the My Safe Florida 18 Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal 19 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership 20 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does 21 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the 22 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of 23 residential property in this state. Implementation of this 24 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is 25 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability 26 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed 27 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of 28 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects 29 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in 30 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by 31 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other 32 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of 33 available funds. If, after applications are processed and 34 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept 35 applications up to the available amount. The program shall 36 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach 37 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements 38 provided in this section. 39 (2)âHURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.âFinancial grants shall be 40 used by homeowners to make improvements recommended by an 41 inspection which increase resistance to hurricane damage. 42 (j)âA homeowner who receives a grant shall finalize 43 construction and request a final inspection, or request an 44 extension for an additional 6 months, within 1 year after grant 45 approval. If a homeowner fails to comply with this paragraph, 46 his or her application is deemed abandoned and the grant money 47 reverts to the department. The department must notify the 48 applicant if an application is deemed abandoned. If the 49 applicant responds to such notification within 5 business days 50 and demonstrates good cause for the failure to comply with this 51 paragraph, the applicant may submit a subsequent grant 52 application. 53 (3)âREQUESTS FOR INFORMATION.âThe department may request 54 that an applicant provide additional information. An application 55 is deemed withdrawn by the applicant if the department does not 56 receive a response to its request for additional information 57 within 60 days after the notification of any apparent error or 58 omission. The department must notify the applicant if an 59 application has been deemed withdrawn. If the applicant responds 60 to such notification within 5 business days, demonstrates good 61 cause for any error or omission, and corrects the error or 62 omission in that time period, the application may not be deemed 63 withdrawn. 64 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.